Utah statutes.
31A-29-108.   Examination -- Financial report.

(1)  The pool is subject to examination by the commissioner.

(2)  By December 1 of each year, the board shall submit to the commissioner an audited financial report for the preceding fiscal year in a form approved by the commissioner.

